Utah statutes.
78B-16-106.   Contents of petition.

(1)  A petition under this chapter must be verified and include a copy of any existing child custody determination, if available.  The petition must specify the risk factors for abduction, including the relevant factors described in Section 78B-16-107.

(2)  Subject to Subsection 78B-13-209(5), if reasonably ascertainable, the petition must contain:

(a)  the name, date of birth, and gender of the child;

(b)  the customary address and current physical location of the child;

(c)  the identity, customary address, and current physical location of the respondent;

(d)  a statement of whether a prior action to prevent abduction or domestic violence has been filed by a party or other individual or entity having custody of the child, and the date, location, and disposition of the action;

(e)  a statement of whether a party to the proceeding has been arrested for a crime related to domestic violence, stalking, or child abuse or neglect, and the date, location, and disposition of the case; and

(f)  any other information required to be submitted to the court for a child custody determination under Section 78B-13-209.

